Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4204
Agent or insurance agent, defined.

Agent or insurance agent means any person licensed as an insurance agent by the department and duly appointed and authorized by an insurer to solicit applications for insurance and to discharge such other duties as may be vested in or required of the agent by the insurer.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 4.